test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-u-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Verb - ловиньтаӈкве: # Verb 'to read, to count' - full paradigm
    тотуӈкве+V+Inf: тотуӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тотэ̄гум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тотэ̄гын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тотыме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тотэ̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тотэ̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тотэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: тотылум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: тотылын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: тотытэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: тотылуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотылын, тотылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: тотытэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: тотылув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотылын, тотылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: тотыяныл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: тотыягум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: тотыягын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: тотыяге
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: тотыягме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотыягын, тотыягы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: тотыяге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: тотыягув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотыягын, тотыягы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: тотыяганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: тотыянум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотыянын, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: тотыянэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: тотыянаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотыянын, тотыяны̄н, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: тотыянэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: тотыянув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотыянын, тотыяны̄н, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: тотыяныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотсум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: тотыс
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотсуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тотсын, тотсы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [тотсыг, тотсы̄г]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [тотсув, тотсӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тотсын, тотсы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотсыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: тотыслум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: тотыслын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: тотыстэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: тотысламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотыслын, тотыслы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: тотыстэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: тотыслув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотыслын, тотыслы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: тотсаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: тотсагум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: тотсагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: тотсаге
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: тотсагме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотсагын, тотсагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: тотсаге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: тотсагув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотсагын, тотсагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: тотсаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: тотсанум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотса̄нын, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: тотсанэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: [тотсанаме̄н, тотсанаме̄н, тотсанме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотсанын, тотсаны̄н, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: тотсанэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: тотсанув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотсанын, тотсаны̄н, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: тотсаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [тотнувум, тотнӯвум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [тотнувын, тотнӯвын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: тотнув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: тотнуваме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [тотнувын, тотнувы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [тотнувыг, тотнувы̄г]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [тотнувув, тотнӯвув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [тотнувын, тотнувы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [тотнувыт, тотнувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: [тотнувлум, тотнӯвлум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын, тотнӯвлын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: [тотнувтэ, тотнӯвтэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg3: тотнувламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын, тотнувлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg3: тотнувтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: тотнувлув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын, тотнувлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: [тотнуваныл, тотнува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu3: [тотнувагум, тотнува̄гум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын, тотнува̄гын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu3: [тотнуваге, тотнува̄ге]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu3: тотнувагме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын, тотнувагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu3: тотнуваге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu3: тотнувагув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын, тотнувагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu3: [тотнуваганыл, тотнувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: [тотнуванум, тотнува̄нум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын, тотнува̄нын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: [тотнуванэ, тотнува̄нэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl3: тотнуванме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын, тотнуваны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl3: тотнуванэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: тотнуванув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын, тотнуваны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: [тотнуваныл, тотнува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотэлн, тотэ̄лн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотэлн, тотэлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотэлн, тотэлы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотэгын, тотэ̄гн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотэгын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотэгын, тотэгы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тотавем
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тотаве
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тотавеме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тотаве̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тотаве̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тотавет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотве̄сум
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотве̄сын
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [тотвес, тотве̄с]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотвесеме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тотвесын, тотвесы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: тотвесы̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: тотвесув
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тотвесын, тотвесы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [тотнувем, тотнӯвем]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [тотнувен, тотнӯвен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [тотнуве, тотнӯве]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: тотнувеме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [тотнувен, тотнуве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [тотнувег, тотнуве̄г]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: тотнуве̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [тотнувен, тотнуве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [тотнувет, тотнӯвет]
 
#Passive, imperative conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]

#Present participle
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc: тотнэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: [тотнэм, тотнэ̄м]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [тотнэн, тотнэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: тотнэ̄тэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: тотнэме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: тотнэнэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [тотнэг, тотнӭг]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [тотнэв, тотнэ̄в]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [тотнэнэ̄н, тотнэнэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [тотнэт, тотнэ̄т]

#Present participle, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: тотнэ̄лум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: тотнэ̄лн
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: тотнэ̄тэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: тотнэламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: тотнэлы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: тотнэтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [тотнэлув, тотнэлӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: тотнэлы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [тотнэ̄нл, тотнэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: тотнэ̄гум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: тотнэ̄гн
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: тотнэ̄гэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: тотнэгаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: тотнэгы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: тотнэгэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [тотнэгув, тотнэгӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: тотнэгагы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: тотнэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: тотнэ̄нум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: тотнэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: тотнэ̄нэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: [тотнэнаме̄н, тотнэнанме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [тотнэны̄н, тотнэныны̄н, тотнэнаны̄н] 
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [тотнэнэ̄н, тотнэнанэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [тотнэнув, тотнэнӯв, тотнэнанув, тотнэнанӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [тотнэны̄н, тотнэнаны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [тотнэ̄нл, тотнэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc: тотум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: тотмум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: тотмын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: тотме
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: тотмаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [тотмын, тотмы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: тотмыг
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [тотмув, тотӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [тотмын, тотмы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: тотмыт

#Past participle, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: тотмылум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: тотмылын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: тотмытэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: тотмыламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: тотмылы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: тотмытэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [тотмылув, тотмылӯв]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: тотмылы̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: тотманыл
